Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1583
Fund; land diversion payments; authorized.

Expenditures may be made from the Nebraska Soil and Water Conservation Fund to individual landowners as land diversion payments for the purpose of encouraging alternate cropping patterns which, when implemented, will assure a longer conservation practice construction period. No such payments shall be made until the intended projects or practices have been completed.

Laws 1983, LB 236, § 6.